Virginia statutes. Title 56. Public Service Companies.
Article 2. Service.

§ 56-111.
When railroads may operate by motor vehicle or aircraft.

Any railroad doing business in this Commonwealth may acquire, own and operate motor vehicles for the purpose of transporting persons or property over the public highways as a common carrier by motor vehicle as that term is defined by §

46.2-2000

, subject to the laws of Virginia governing the operations and regulation of common carriers by motor vehicle and all lawful regulations of the Commonwealth made pursuant thereto and applying to other motor vehicles or
other common carriers by motor vehicle, including the laws requiring the payment of registration and license fees and other taxes by common carriers by motor vehicle, when lawfully authorized in accordance with the provisions of such
laws and regulations.

Any such railroad may also acquire, own and operate equipment for and engage in air transportation, subject to the provisions of the law regulating air transportation.

History.
1938, p. 1000; Michie Code 1942, § 3857a; 1944, p. 537; 1996, cc. 114, 157.

Cross references.

For constitutional provision as to the control of transportation companies, see Va. Const., Art. IX, § 2.

The 1996 amendments.

The 1996 amendments by cc. 114 and 157 are identical, and, in the first paragraph, substituted “doing business” for “electric railway or steamboat corporation operating a railroad, electric railway or steamboat line,” substituted “§

46.2-2000

” for “§ 56-273,” substituted “Commonwealth” for “Commission,” and deleted “so to do by the Commission” following “authorized”; deleted the former second paragraph which read: “So long as the gross transportation receipts
from operations as a common carrier by motor vehicle are subject to road tax, such gross transportation receipts shall not be included in the gross transportation receipts of any such railroad or steamboat corporation upon which its
annual state franchise tax is calculated”; and in the present second paragraph, deleted “electric railway or steamboat corporation” following “railroad” and substituted “air” for “aerial” in two places.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see
2C M.J. Aviation, § 1; 3B M.J. Carriers, § 117.

§§ 56-112 through 56-116.
Repealed by Acts 1996, cc. 114 and 157.

Editor’s note.

Section 56-114 was also previously repealed by Acts 1975, cc. 77, 547.

§ 56-117.
Company to notify consignee of arrival of freight.

It shall be the duty of every railroad company, or carrier, upon the arrival of freight shipped to any of its depots or stations, to notify the consignee by mail, electronic data transfer, or otherwise when such freight is ready for delivery, and to give
a reasonable time for the removal of the same, making due allowance for its class and bad weather and holidays.

History.
Code 1919, § 3916; 1996, cc. 114, 157.

The 1996 amendments.

The 1996 amendments by cc. 114 and 157 are identical, and substituted “railroad” for “transportation” and inserted “electronic data transfer” following “mail.”

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see
3B M.J. Carriers, §§ 6, 18.

§ 56-118.
Freight bill; what to contain.

Every railroad company or line, doing business in this Commonwealth, shall, at the time when such company delivers any articles shipped or transported over its line, furnish to the owner or consignee thereof, or to his agent, a bill, plainly stating the
class of freight to which the articles belong, the weight thereof, and the rate charged for transporting the same. Bills may be furnished by mail or contemporaneous electronic transmission.

History.
Code 1919, § 3917; 1996, cc. 114, 157.

The 1996 amendments.

The 1996 amendments by cc. 114 and 157 are identical, and substituted “railroad” for ‘transportation” and added the second sentence.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see
3B M.J. Carriers, § 23.